Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-303
Alcohol and drug counseling, defined.

Alcohol and drug counseling means providing or performing the core functions of an alcohol and drug counselor for remuneration.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 154.